Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6065XS (3) 91 jm/jh S.F. 2285 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 422.12R Car registration fee tax 1 credit ââ disabled veteran. 2 1. As used in this section, âdisabled veteranâ means either 3 of the following: 4 a. A veteran as defined in section 35.1 with a permanent 5 service-connected disability rating of one hundred percent, as 6 certified by the United States department of veterans affairs, 7 or a permanent and total disability rating based on individual 8 unemployability that is compensated at the one hundred percent 9 disability rate, as certified by the United States department 10 of veterans affairs. 11 b. A former member of the national guard of any state who 12 otherwise meets the service requirements of section 35.1, 13 subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2) or (7), with a 14 permanent service-connected disability rating of one hundred 15 percent, as certified by the United States department of 16 veterans affairs, or a permanent and total disability rating 17 based on individual unemployability that is compensated at the 18 one hundred percent disability rate, as certified by the United 19 States department of veterans affairs. 20 2. The taxes imposed under this subchapter, less the 21 credits allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by a 22 car registration fee tax credit equal to the amount of a car 23 registration fee paid by a disabled veteran under section 24 321.105 for the year, not to exceed a maximum amount of one 25 hundred dollars. 26 3. Any credit in excess of the tax liability is refundable. 27 In lieu of claiming a refund, the taxpayer may elect to have 28 the overpayment shown on the taxpayerâs final, completed return 29 credited to the tax liability for the following tax year. 30 4. The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 31 administer this section. 32 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 33 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tax years beginning on 34 or after that date. 35 -1- LSB 6065XS (3) 91 jm/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 2285